Maryland, session 2025, HB0813.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health – General
15–118.
(b) (1) [Except] SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION AND
EXCEPT as provided under paragraph [(2)] (3) of this subsection, the Program shall
establish [maximum] MINIMUM reimbursement levels for the drug products for which
there is a generic equivalent authorized under § 12–504 of the Health Occupations Article[,
based on the cost of the generic product].
(2) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (4) OF THIS SUBSECTION,
MINIMUM REIMBURSEMENT LEVELS ESTABLISHED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION SHALL BE AT LEAST EQUAL TO THE NATIONAL AVERAGE DRUG

HOUSE BILL 813 3
ACQUISITION COST OF THE GENERIC PRODUCT PLUS THE FEE–FOR–SERVICE
PROFESSIONAL DISPENSING FEE DETERMINED BY THE DEPARTMENT IN
ACCORDANCE WITH THE MOST RECENT IN–STATE COST–OF–DISPENSING SURVEY.
[(2)] (3) [If] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (4) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, IF a prescriber directs a specific brand name drug, the reimbursement level
shall be based on the [cost] NATIONAL AVERAGE DRUG ACQUISITION COST of the
brand name product PLUS THE FEE–FOR–SERVICE PROFESSIONAL DISPENSING FEE
DETERMINED BY THE DEPARTMENT IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE MOST RECENT
IN–STATE COST–OF–DISPENSING SURVEY.
(4) PARAGRAPHS (2) AND (3) OF THIS SUBSECTION DO NOT APPLY TO:
(I) A PHARMACY OWNED BY OR UNDER THE SAME CORPORATE
AFFILIATION AS A PHARMACY BENEFITS MANAGER; OR
(II) A MAIL ORDER PHARMACY.
(F) THE PROVISIONS OF § 15–1632 OF THE INSURANCE ARTICLE APPLY TO
A MANAGED CARE ORGANIZATION THAT USES A PHARMACY BENEFITS MANAGER TO
MANAGE PRESCRIPTION DRUG COVERAGE BENEFITS ON BEHALF OF THE MANAGED
CARE ORGANIZATION.
Article – Insurance
15–1601.
(s) (1) “Purchaser” means a person that offers a plan or program in the State,
including the State Employee and Retiree Health and Welfare Benefits Program, AN
INSURER, A NONPROFIT HEALTH SERVICE PLAN, OR A HEALTH MAINTENANCE
ORGANIZATION, that:
[(1)] (I) provides prescription drug coverage or benefits in the State; and
[(2)] (II) enters into an agreement with a pharmacy benefits manager for
the provision of pharmacy benefits management services.
(2) “PURCHASER” DOES NOT INCLUDE A NONPROFIT HEALTH
MAINTENANCE ORGANIZATION THAT:
(I) OPERATES AS A GROUP MODEL;
(II) PROVIDES SERVICES SOLELY TO A MEMBER OR PATIENT OF
THE NONPROFIT HEALTH MAINTENANCE ORGANIZATION; AND

HOUSE BILL 813
(III) FURNISHES SERVICES THROUGH THE INTERNAL PHARMACY
OPERATIONS OF THE NONPROFIT HEALTH MAINTENANCE ORGANIZATION.
15–1632.
A PHARMACY BENEFITS MANAGER THAT CONTRACTS WITH A PHARMACY ON
BEHALF OF A MANAGED CARE ORGANIZATION, AS DEFINED IN § 15–101 OF THE
HEALTH – GENERAL ARTICLE, SHALL REIMBURSE THE PHARMACY AN AMOUNT
THAT IS AT LEAST EQUAL TO THE NATIONAL AVERAGE DRUG ACQUISITION COST
PLUS THE FEE–FOR–SERVICE PROFESSIONAL DISPENSING FEE DETERMINED BY THE
MARYLAND DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH FOR THE MARYLAND MEDICAL ASSISTANCE
PROGRAM IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE MOST RECENT IN–STATE
COST–OF–DISPENSING SURVEY.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act is an emergency
measure, is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public health or safety, has
been passed by a yea and nay vote supported by three–fifths of all the members elected to
each of the two Houses of the General Assembly, and shall take effect from the date it is
enacted.
SECTION 1. BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Maryland Insurance Administration and the Maryland Department of Health, in
consultation with the Prescription Drug Affordability Board, shall:
(1) convene a workgroup of interested stakeholders, including community
pharmacies from both chain and independent settings, pharmacy services administrative
organizations, health insurance carriers, plan sponsor representatives, drug wholesalers
and distributors, non–pharmacy benefit manager–owned mail order pharmacies, brand
name and generic drug manufacturers, pharmacists, pharmacy benefits managers, and
managed care organizations, and third–party experts in the field of drug pricing in
Medicaid;
(2) review reimbursement for pharmacists, including:
(i) existing Maryland Medical Assistance Program requirements for
pharmacy benefits managers and managed care organizations related to dispensing fee
reimbursement, pharmacy benefits managers fees charged to pharmacies and the
Maryland Medical Assistance Program, transparency in pricing and reimbursement data,
specialty drug designations, and appeals processes;
(ii) how other states’ pharmacy benefits services operate in
Medicaid, including in Ohio, Kentucky, New York, California, and West Virginia;

HOUSE BILL 813 5
(iii) measures that offset the Department’s costs to fund the Medicaid
Managed Care Program and adopt NADAC plus the Fee–for–Service Professional
Dispensing, including:
1. savings associated with NADAC ingredient cost pricing
and managed care organizations; and
2. pharmacy benefits managers administrative fee
consolidation and rebate allocations; and
(iv) strategies for adopting pharmacy reimbursement parity and
drug pricing transparency;
(3) review coverage requirements for specialty drugs, including:
(i) which drugs are considered specialty for purposes of formularies
across carriers and pharmacy benefits managers; and
(ii) what these drugs have in common for purposes of developing a
new definition for “specialty drug”;
(4) review ERISA exemptions for pharmacy benefits management
regulation, including:
(i) the scope of Rutledge v. Pharmaceutical Care Management
Association and subsequent case law and federal guidance;
(ii) how other states have responded to the Rutledge decision; and
(iii) what, if any, other State laws should be amended;
(5) review the costs associated with pharmacies contracting with
commercial plans versus pharmacies contracting with the Maryland Medical Assistance
Program;
(6) review provisions of State law regarding pharmacy benefit managers,
specialty pharmacies, and anti–steering, including:
(i) § 15–1611.1 of the Insurance Article related to the use of specific
pharmacies or entities and the effect the section has on pharmacy costs in the fully insured
market; and
(ii) § 15–1612 of the Insurance Article related to reimbursement and
the effect the section has on pharmacy costs in the fully insured market;
(5) (7) on or before December 31, 2025, submit an interim report on their
findings and recommendations to the Senate Finance Committee and the House Health

HOUSE BILL 813
and Government Operations Committee, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State
Government Article; and
(6) (8) on or before December 31, 2026, submit a final report on their findings
and recommendations to the Senate Finance Committee and the House Health and
Government Operations Committee, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government
Article.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2025.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.